Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.145

Authorization to leave facility where person is confined prohibited—Exceptions—Approval by secretary—Notification to county or city law enforcement agency.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) No person committed to the custody of the department for the determination of competency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.060, the restoration of competency for trial under RCW 10.77.084, 10.77.086, or 10.77.088, or following an acquittal by reason of insanity shall be authorized to leave the facility where the person is confined, except in the following circumstances:

(a) In accordance with conditional release or furlough authorized by a court;

(b) For necessary medical or legal proceedings not available in the facility where the person is confined;

(c) For visits to the bedside of a member of the person's immediate family who is seriously ill; or

(d) For attendance at the funeral of a member of the person's immediate family.

(2) Unless ordered otherwise by a court, no leave under subsection (1) of this section shall be authorized unless the person who is the subject of the authorization is escorted by a person approved by the secretary. During the authorized leave, the person approved by the secretary must be in visual or auditory contact at all times with the person on authorized leave.

(3) Prior to the authorization of any leave under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary must give notification to any county or city law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in the location of the leave destination.

[ 2010 c 262 s 1.]